src/scripts/Slovak/pg2p.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Copyright (C) 2023 Grzegorz Zlotowicz  <grzezlo@gmail.com>

# - will separate the phrases, and the .#. is the usual boundary mark
# - in Foma, which in this case will mean the start and end of the
# - utterance.
define PB %- | %, ; 

# # will separate the words in the same phrase.
define WB %# | PB ; 

#  Czech przepozisions should be pronounced as letters, not words,  when such word is only one in the utterance.

define czechPrep [
[a0]: [aa1] | 
[aa0]: [d iil1 l h ee0 aa1] | 
[ae]: [p r e0 h l a0 s o v a0 n ee1 aa0] | 
[e0]: [ee1] | 
[ee0]: [d iil1 l h ee0 ee1] | 
[i0]: [ii1] | 
[ii0]: [d iil1 l h ee0 ii1] | 
k: [k aa1] | 
l: [e l] | 
[lj]: [e1 l z m e0 k ts e0 nj o1 m] |
[ll]: [e1 l z d iil1 ll zh nj o1 m] |
[o0]: [oo1] | 
[oo0]: [d iil1 l h ee0 oo1] | 
[uo]: [oo1 z v o0 k aa1 nj o0 m] | 
r:[e r] | 
[rz]: [e1 r z m e0 k ts e0 nj o1 m] |
[rr]: [e1 r z d iil1 ll zh nj o1 m] |
s: [e s] |
[u0]: [u1] | 
[uu0]: [d iil1 l h ee0 uu1] | 
v: [v ee1] | 
z: [z e1 t] 
] @-> || .#. _ .#. ;

define spellLetters [
y0: [y p s i0 l oo1 n] |
yy: [yy p s i0 l oo1 n]]
@-> || [.#. | WB] _ [.#. | WB] ;

define VoicedConsonantPhonem [b|d|dj|dz|dzh|g|h|z|zh|v|m|n|nj|l|ľ|r|j] ; 
define VoicelessConsonantPhonem [p|t|tj|c|ts|k|hh|s|sh|f] ; 
define ShortVowelPhonem [a | e | i | o | u ] ;

define NounsAfterK [[nj i1 m] | [nj e1 m u0] | [nj e1 j] | [n aa1 m] | [v aa1 m]] ; 
define vzAssimilation v @-> f || WB | .#. _ WB VoicelessConsonantPhonem ,, z @-> s || WB | .#. _ WB VoicelessConsonantPhonem ,, k @-> pvlg || WB | .#. _ WB NounsAfterK ,, k @-> g || WB | .#. _ WB VoicedConsonantPhonem ;

define sExceptions s @-> pvlz || WB | .#. _ WB [[nj ii1 m] | [nj i1 m] | [v a1 m]] ;
define sAssimilation s @-> z || WB | .#. _ WB [VoicedConsonantPhonem | ShortVowelPhonem] ;
define VoicelessAssimilationPause 
pvlb @-> p || _ PB ,, pvld @-> t || _ PB ,, pvldj @-> tj || _ PB ,, pvldz @-> c ||  PB ,, pvldzh @-> ts || _ PB ,, pvlg @-> k || _ PB ,, pvlh @-> hh || _ PB ,, pvlz @-> s || _ PB ,, pvlzh @-> sh || _ PB ,, pvlv @-> f || _ PB ;
define VoicelessAssimilation 
pvlb @-> b || \WB _ WB VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, pvld @-> d || \WB _ WB VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, pvldj @-> dj || \WB _ WB VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, pvldz @-> dz || \WB _ WB VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, pvldzh @-> dzh || \WB _ WB VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, pvlg @-> g || \WB _ WB VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, pvlh @-> h || \WB _ WB VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, pvlz @-> z || \WB _ WB VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, pvlzh @-> zh || \WB _ WB VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, pvlv @-> v || \WB _ WB VoicedConsonantPhonem ;
define AssimilationEnd pvlb @-> p || _ ,, pvld @-> t || _ ,, pvldj @-> tj || _ ,, pvldz @-> c || _ ,, pvldzh @-> ts || _ ,, pvlg @-> k || _ ,, pvlh @-> hh || _ ,, pvlz @-> s || _ ,, pvlzh @-> sh || _ ,, pvlv @-> f || _ ; 

define FixForeign kv @-> [k v] ,, ks @-> [k s] ;

source unicodechars.foma

regex czechPrep .o. spellLetters .o. vzAssimilation .o. sExceptions .o. sAssimilation .o. VoicelessAssimilationPause .o. VoicelessAssimilation .o. AssimilationEnd .o. FixForeign .o. NormalizeCharactersBase ;
